Nebraska, session 109, LB817.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB817 LB817
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 28-416, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-416 (1) Except as authorized by the Uniform Controlled Substances
Act, it shall be unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally: (a)
To manufacture, distribute, deliver, dispense, or possess with intent to
manufacture, distribute, deliver, or dispense a controlled substance; or
(b) to create, distribute, or possess with intent to distribute a
counterfeit controlled substance.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (4), (5), (7), (8), (9), and
(10), and (11) of this section, any person who violates subsection (1) of
this section with respect to: (a) A controlled substance classified in
Schedule I, II, or III of section 28-405 which is an exceptionally
hazardous drug shall be guilty of a Class II felony; (b) any other
controlled substance classified in Schedule I, II, or III of section
28-405 shall be guilty of a Class IIA felony; or (c) a controlled
substance classified in Schedule IV or V of section 28-405 shall be
guilty of a Class IIIA felony.
(3) A person knowingly or intentionally possessing a controlled
substance, except marijuana or any substance containing a quantifiable
amount of the substances, chemicals, or compounds described, defined, or
delineated in subdivision (c)(28) of Schedule I of section 28-405, unless
such substance was obtained directly or pursuant to a medical order
issued by a practitioner authorized to prescribe while acting in the
course of his or her professional practice, or except as otherwise
authorized by the act, shall be guilty of a Class IV felony. A person
shall not be in violation of this subsection if section 28-472 or 28-1701
applies.
(4)(a) Except as authorized by the Uniform Controlled Substances
Act, any person eighteen years of age or older who knowingly or
intentionally manufactures, distributes, delivers, dispenses, or
possesses with intent to manufacture, distribute, deliver, or dispense a
-2-

LB817 LB817
2026 2026
controlled substance or a counterfeit controlled substance (i) to a
person under the age of eighteen years, (ii) in, on, or within one
thousand feet of the real property comprising a public or private
elementary, vocational, or secondary school, a community college, a
public or private college, junior college, or university, or a
playground, or (iii) within one hundred feet of a public or private youth
center, public swimming pool, or video arcade facility shall be punished
by the next higher penalty classification than the penalty prescribed in
subsection (2), (7), (8), (9), or (10), or (11) of this section,
depending upon the controlled substance involved, for the first violation
and for a second or subsequent violation shall be punished by the next
higher penalty classification than that prescribed for a first violation
of this subsection, but in no event shall such person be punished by a
penalty greater than a Class IB felony.
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Playground means any outdoor facility, including any parking lot
appurtenant to the facility, intended for recreation, open to the public,
and with any portion containing three or more apparatus intended for the
recreation of children, including sliding boards, swingsets, and
teeterboards;
(ii) Video arcade facility means any facility legally accessible to
persons under eighteen years of age, intended primarily for the use of
pinball and video machines for amusement, and containing a minimum of ten
pinball or video machines; and
(iii) Youth center means any recreational facility or gymnasium,
including any parking lot appurtenant to the facility or gymnasium,
intended primarily for use by persons under eighteen years of age which
regularly provides athletic, civic, or cultural activities.
(5)(a) Except as authorized by the Uniform Controlled Substances
Act, it shall be unlawful for any person eighteen years of age or older
to knowingly and intentionally employ, hire, use, cause, persuade, coax,
-3-

LB817 LB817
2026 2026
induce, entice, seduce, or coerce any person under the age of eighteen
years to manufacture, transport, distribute, carry, deliver, dispense,
prepare for delivery, offer for delivery, or possess with intent to do
the same a controlled substance or a counterfeit controlled substance.
(b) Except as authorized by the Uniform Controlled Substances Act,
it shall be unlawful for any person eighteen years of age or older to
knowingly and intentionally employ, hire, use, cause, persuade, coax,
induce, entice, seduce, or coerce any person under the age of eighteen
years to aid and abet any person in the manufacture, transportation,
distribution, carrying, delivery, dispensing, preparation for delivery,
offering for delivery, or possession with intent to do the same of a
controlled substance or a counterfeit controlled substance.
(c) Any person who violates subdivision (a) or (b) of this
subsection shall be punished by the next higher penalty classification
than the penalty prescribed in subsection (2), (7), (8), (9), or (10), or
(11) of this section, depending upon the controlled substance involved,
for the first violation and for a second or subsequent violation shall be
punished by the next higher penalty classification than that prescribed
for a first violation of this subsection, but in no event shall such
person be punished by a penalty greater than a Class IB felony.
(6) It shall not be a defense to prosecution for violation of
subsection (4) or (5) of this section that the defendant did not know the
age of the person through whom the defendant violated such subsection.
(7) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section with
respect to cocaine or any mixture or substance containing a detectable
amount of cocaine in a quantity of:
(a) One hundred forty grams or more shall be guilty of a Class IB
felony;
(b) At least twenty-eight grams but less than one hundred forty
grams shall be guilty of a Class IC felony; or
(c) At least ten grams but less than twenty-eight grams shall be
-4-

LB817 LB817
2026 2026
guilty of a Class ID felony.
(8) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section with
respect to base cocaine (crack) or any mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of base cocaine in a quantity of:
(a) One hundred forty grams or more shall be guilty of a Class IB
felony;
(b) At least twenty-eight grams but less than one hundred forty
grams shall be guilty of a Class IC felony; or
(c) At least ten grams but less than twenty-eight grams shall be
guilty of a Class ID felony.
(9) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section with
respect to heroin or any mixture or substance containing a detectable
amount of heroin in a quantity of:
(a) One hundred forty grams or more shall be guilty of a Class IB
felony;
(b) At least twenty-eight grams but less than one hundred forty
grams shall be guilty of a Class IC felony; or
(c) At least ten grams but less than twenty-eight grams shall be
guilty of a Class ID felony.
(10) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section with
respect to amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of its
isomers, or with respect to methamphetamine, its salts, optical isomers,
and salts of its isomers, in a quantity of:
(a) One hundred forty grams or more shall be guilty of a Class IB
felony;
(b) At least twenty-eight grams but less than one hundred forty
grams shall be guilty of a Class IC felony; or
(c) At least ten grams but less than twenty-eight grams shall be
guilty of a Class ID felony.
(11)(a) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section with
respect to fentanyl or any mixture or substance containing a detectable
-5-

LB817 LB817
2026 2026
amount of fentanyl in a quantity of:
(i) One hundred forty grams or more shall be guilty of a Class IB
felony;
(ii) At least twenty-eight grams but less than one hundred forty
grams shall be guilty of a Class IC felony; or
(iii) At least ten grams but less than twenty-eight grams shall be
guilty of a Class ID felony.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, fentanyl means:
(i) Fentanyl;
(ii) Any isomer, ester, ether, or salt of fentanyl or any salt of
any isomer, ester, or ether of fentanyl; and
(iii) Any substance described in subdivision (a)(111) of Schedule I
of section 28-405.
(12) (11) Any person knowingly or intentionally possessing marijuana
weighing more than one ounce but not more than one pound shall be guilty
of a Class III misdemeanor.
(13) (12) Any person knowingly or intentionally possessing marijuana
weighing more than one pound shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.
(14) (13) Except as provided in section 28-1701, any person
knowingly or intentionally possessing marijuana weighing one ounce or
less or any substance containing a quantifiable amount of the substances,
chemicals, or compounds described, defined, or delineated in subdivision
(c)(28) of Schedule I of section 28-405 shall:
(a) For the first offense, be guilty of an infraction, receive a
citation, be fined three hundred dollars, and be assigned to attend a
course as prescribed in section 29-433 if the judge determines that
attending such course is in the best interest of the individual
defendant;
(b) For the second offense, be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor,
receive a citation, and be fined four hundred dollars and may be
imprisoned not to exceed five days; and
-6-

LB817 LB817
2026 2026
(c) For the third and all subsequent offenses, be guilty of a Class
IIIA misdemeanor, receive a citation, be fined five hundred dollars, and
be imprisoned not to exceed seven days.
(15) (14) Any person convicted of violating this section, if placed
on probation, shall, as a condition of probation, satisfactorily attend
and complete appropriate treatment and counseling on drug abuse provided
by a program authorized under the Nebraska Behavioral Health Services Act
or other licensed drug treatment facility.
(16) (15) Any person convicted of violating this section, if
sentenced to the Department of Correctional Services, shall attend
appropriate treatment and counseling on drug abuse.
(17)(a) (16)(a) Any person convicted of a violation of subsection
(1) of this section shall be punished by the next higher penalty
classification than the penalty prescribed in subsection (2), (7), (8),
(9), or (10), or (11) of this section if:
(i) The person knowingly or intentionally possessed a firearm while
in violation of subsection (1) of this section; or
(ii) Such violation resulted in the use of the controlled substance
and directly and proximately caused the death of, or serious bodily
injury to, another person.
(b) A penalty enhanced under this subsection shall in no event
result in a penalty greater than a Class IB felony.
(18) (17) A person knowingly or intentionally in possession of money
used or intended to be used to facilitate a violation of subsection (1)
of this section shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.
(19) (18) In addition to the existing penalties available for a
violation of subsection (1) of this section, including any criminal
attempt or conspiracy to violate subsection (1) of this section, a
sentencing court may order that any money, securities, negotiable
instruments, firearms, conveyances, or electronic communication devices
as defined in section 28-833 or any equipment, components, peripherals,
-7-

LB817 LB817
2026 2026
software, hardware, or accessories related to electronic communication
devices be forfeited as a part of the sentence imposed if it finds by
clear and convincing evidence adduced at a separate hearing in the same
prosecution, following conviction for a violation of subsection (1) of
this section, and conducted pursuant to section 28-1601, that any or all
such property was derived from, used, or intended to be used to
facilitate a violation of subsection (1) of this section.
(20) (19) In addition to the penalties provided in this section:
(a) If the person convicted or adjudicated of violating this section
is eighteen years of age or younger and has one or more licenses or
permits issued under the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act:
(i) For the first offense, the court may, as a part of the judgment
of conviction or adjudication, (A) impound any such licenses or permits
for thirty days and (B) require such person to attend a drug education
class;
(ii) For a second offense, the court may, as a part of the judgment
of conviction or adjudication, (A) impound any such licenses or permits
for ninety days and (B) require such person to complete no fewer than
twenty and no more than forty hours of community service and to attend a
drug education class; and
(iii) For a third or subsequent offense, the court may, as a part of
the judgment of conviction or adjudication, (A) impound any such licenses
or permits for twelve months and (B) require such person to complete no
fewer than sixty hours of community service, to attend a drug education
class, and to submit to a drug assessment by a licensed alcohol and drug
counselor; and
(b) If the person convicted or adjudicated of violating this section
is eighteen years of age or younger and does not have a permit or license
issued under the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act:
(i) For the first offense, the court may, as part of the judgment of
conviction or adjudication, (A) prohibit such person from obtaining any
-8-

LB817 LB817
2026 2026
permit or any license pursuant to the act for which such person would
otherwise be eligible until thirty days after the date of such order and
(B) require such person to attend a drug education class;
(ii) For a second offense, the court may, as part of the judgment of
conviction or adjudication, (A) prohibit such person from obtaining any
permit or any license pursuant to the act for which such person would
otherwise be eligible until ninety days after the date of such order and
(B) require such person to complete no fewer than twenty hours and no
more than forty hours of community service and to attend a drug education
class; and
(iii) For a third or subsequent offense, the court may, as part of
the judgment of conviction or adjudication, (A) prohibit such person from
obtaining any permit or any license pursuant to the act for which such
person would otherwise be eligible until twelve months after the date of
such order and (B) require such person to complete no fewer than sixty
hours of community service, to attend a drug education class, and to
submit to a drug assessment by a licensed alcohol and drug counselor.
A copy of an abstract of the court's conviction or adjudication
shall be transmitted to the Director of Motor Vehicles pursuant to
sections 60-497.01 to 60-497.04 if a license or permit is impounded or a
juvenile is prohibited from obtaining a license or permit under this
subsection.
Sec. 2. Section 28-1354, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-1354 For purposes of the Public Protection Act:
(1) Enterprise means any individual, sole proprietorship,
partnership, corporation, trust, association, or any legal entity, union,
or group of individuals associated in fact although not a legal entity,
and shall include illicit as well as licit enterprises as well as other
entities;
(2) Pattern of racketeering activity means a cumulative loss for one
-9-

LB817 LB817
2026 2026
or more victims or gains for the enterprise of not less than one thousand
five hundred dollars resulting from at least two acts of racketeering
activity, one of which occurred after August 30, 2009, and the last of
which occurred within ten years, excluding any period of imprisonment,
after the commission of a prior act of racketeering activity;
(3) Until January 1, 2017, person means any individual or entity, as
defined in section 21-2014, holding or capable of holding a legal,
equitable, or beneficial interest in property. Beginning January 1, 2017,
person means any individual or entity, as defined in section 21-214,
holding or capable of holding a legal, equitable, or beneficial interest
in property;
(4) Prosecutor includes the Attorney General of the State of
Nebraska, the deputy attorney general, assistant attorneys general, a
county attorney, a deputy county attorney, or any person so designated by
the Attorney General, a county attorney, or a court of the state to carry
out the powers conferred by the act;
(5) Racketeering activity includes the commission of, criminal
attempt to commit, conspiracy to commit, aiding and abetting in the
commission of, aiding in the consummation of, acting as an accessory to
the commission of, or the solicitation, coercion, or intimidation of
another to commit or aid in the commission of any of the following:
(a) Offenses against the person which include: Murder in the first
degree under section 28-303; murder in the second degree under section
28-304; manslaughter under section 28-305; assault in the first degree
under section 28-308; assault in the second degree under section 28-309;
assault in the third degree under section 28-310; terroristic threats
under section 28-311.01; kidnapping under section 28-313; false
imprisonment in the first degree under section 28-314; false imprisonment
in the second degree under section 28-315; sexual assault in the first
degree under section 28-319; and robbery under section 28-324;
(b) Offenses relating to controlled substances which include: To
-10-

LB817 LB817
2026 2026
unlawfully manufacture, distribute, deliver, dispense, or possess with
intent to manufacture, distribute, deliver, or dispense a controlled
substance under subsection (1) of section 28-416; possession of marijuana
weighing more than one pound under subsection (13) (12) of section
28-416; possession of money used or intended to be used to facilitate a
violation of subsection (1) of section 28-416 prohibited under subsection
(18) (17) of section 28-416; any violation of section 28-418; to
unlawfully manufacture, distribute, deliver, or possess with intent to
distribute or deliver an imitation controlled substance under section
28-445; possession of anhydrous ammonia with the intent to manufacture
methamphetamine under section 28-451; and possession of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine with the intent to manufacture
methamphetamine under section 28-452;
(c) Offenses against property which include: Arson in the first
degree under section 28-502; arson in the second degree under section
28-503; arson in the third degree under section 28-504; burglary under
section 28-507; theft by unlawful taking or disposition under section
28-511; theft by shoplifting under section 28-511.01; theft by deception
under section 28-512; theft by extortion under section 28-513; theft of
services under section 28-515; theft by receiving stolen property under
section 28-517; criminal mischief under section 28-519; and unlawfully
depriving or obtaining property or services using a computer under
section 28-1344;
(d) Offenses involving fraud which include: Burning to defraud an
insurer under section 28-505; forgery in the first degree under section
28-602; forgery in the second degree under section 28-603; criminal
possession of a forged instrument under section 28-604; criminal
possession of written instrument forgery devices under section 28-605;
criminal impersonation under section 28-638; identity theft under section
28-639; identity fraud under section 28-640; false statement or book
entry under section 28-612; tampering with a publicly exhibited contest
-11-

LB817 LB817
2026 2026
under section 28-614; issuing a false financial statement for purposes of
obtaining a financial transaction device under section 28-619;
unauthorized use of a financial transaction device under section 28-620;
criminal possession of a financial transaction device under section
28-621; unlawful circulation of a financial transaction device in the
first degree under section 28-622; unlawful circulation of a financial
transaction device in the second degree under section 28-623; criminal
possession of a blank financial transaction device under section 28-624;
criminal sale of a blank financial transaction device under section
28-625; criminal possession of a financial transaction forgery device
under section 28-626; unlawful manufacture of a financial transaction
device under section 28-627; laundering of sales forms under section
28-628; unlawful acquisition of sales form processing services under
section 28-629; unlawful factoring of a financial transaction device
under section 28-630; and fraudulent insurance acts under section 28-631;
(e) Offenses involving governmental operations which include: Abuse
of public records under section 28-911; perjury or subornation of perjury
under section 28-915; bribery under section 28-917; bribery of a witness
under section 28-918; tampering with a witness or informant or jury
tampering under section 28-919; bribery of a juror under section 28-920;
assault on an officer, an emergency responder, a state correctional
employee, a Department of Health and Human Services employee, or a health
care professional in the first degree under section 28-929; assault on an
officer, an emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a
Department of Health and Human Services employee, or a health care
professional in the second degree under section 28-930; assault on an
officer, an emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a
Department of Health and Human Services employee, or a health care
professional in the third degree under section 28-931; and assault on an
officer, an emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a
Department of Health and Human Services employee, or a health care
-12-

LB817 LB817
2026 2026
professional using a motor vehicle under section 28-931.01;
(f) Offenses involving gambling which include: Promoting gambling in
the first degree under section 28-1102; possession of gambling records
under section 28-1105; gambling debt collection under section 28-1105.01;
and possession of a gambling device under section 28-1107;
(g) Offenses relating to firearms, weapons, and explosives which
include: Carrying a concealed weapon under section 28-1202;
transportation or possession of machine guns, short rifles, or short
shotguns under section 28-1203; unlawful possession of a handgun under
section 28-1204; unlawful transfer of a firearm to a juvenile under
section 28-1204.01; possession of a firearm by a prohibited juvenile
offender under section 28-1204.05; using a deadly weapon to commit a
felony, possession of a deadly weapon during the commission of a felony,
or carrying a firearm or destructive device during the commission of a
dangerous misdemeanor under section 28-1205; possession of a deadly
weapon by a prohibited person under section 28-1206; possession of a
defaced firearm under section 28-1207; defacing a firearm under section
28-1208; unlawful discharge of a firearm under section 28-1212.02;
possession, receipt, retention, or disposition of a stolen firearm under
section 28-1212.03; unlawful possession of explosive materials in the
first degree under section 28-1215; unlawful possession of explosive
materials in the second degree under section 28-1216; unlawful sale of
explosives under section 28-1217; use of explosives without a permit
under section 28-1218; obtaining an explosives permit through false
representations under section 28-1219; possession of a destructive device
under section 28-1220; threatening the use of explosives or placing a
false bomb under section 28-1221; using explosives to commit a felony
under section 28-1222; using explosives to damage or destroy property
under section 28-1223; and using explosives to kill or injure any person
under section 28-1224;
(h) Any violation of the Securities Act of Nebraska pursuant to
-13-

LB817 LB817
2026 2026
section 8-1117;
(i) Any violation of the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 pursuant to
section 77-2713;
(j) Offenses relating to public health and morals which include:
Prostitution under section 28-801; pandering under section 28-802;
keeping a place of prostitution under section 28-804; labor trafficking,
sex trafficking, labor trafficking of a minor, or sex trafficking of a
minor under section 28-831; a violation of section 28-1005; and any act
relating to the visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct prohibited
in the Child Sexual Abuse Material Prevention Act; and
(k) A violation of the Computer Crimes Act;
(6) State means the State of Nebraska or any political subdivision
or any department, agency, or instrumentality thereof; and
(7) Unlawful debt means a debt of at least one thousand five hundred
dollars:
(a) Incurred or contracted in gambling activity which was in
violation of federal law or the law of the state or which is
unenforceable under state or federal law in whole or in part as to
principal or interest because of the laws relating to usury; or
(b) Which was incurred in connection with the business of gambling
in violation of federal law or the law of the state or the business of
lending money or a thing of value at a rate usurious under state law if
the usurious rate is at least twice the enforceable rate.
Sec. 3. Section 28-1701, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-1701 (1) A person shall not be arrested or prosecuted for an
eligible alcohol or drug offense if such person witnessed or was the
victim of a sexual assault and such person:
(a) Either:
(i) In good faith, reported such sexual assault to law enforcement;
or
-14-

LB817 LB817
2026 2026
(ii) Requested emergency medical assistance for the victim of the
sexual assault; and
(b) Evidence supporting the arrest or prosecution of the eligible
alcohol or drug offense was obtained or discovered as a result of such
person reporting such sexual assault to law enforcement or requesting
emergency medical assistance.
(2) A person shall not be arrested or prosecuted for an eligible
alcohol or drug offense if:
(a) Evidence supporting the arrest or prosecution of the person for
the offense was obtained or discovered as a result of the investigation
or prosecution of a sexual assault; and
(b) Such person cooperates with law enforcement in the investigation
or prosecution of the sexual assault.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) Eligible alcohol or drug offense means:
(i) A violation of subsection (3) or (14) (13) of section 28-416 or
of section 28-441;
(ii) A violation of section 53-180.02 committed by a person older
than eighteen years of age and under the age of twenty-one years, as
described in subdivision (4)(a) of section 53-180.05;
(iii) A violation of a city or village ordinance similar to
subdivision (3)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section; or
(iv) Attempt, conspiracy, solicitation, being an accessory to,
aiding and abetting, aiding the consummation of, or compounding a felony
with any of the offenses in subdivision (3)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this
section as the underlying offense; and
(b) Sexual assault means:
(i) A violation of section 28-316.01, 28-319, 28-319.01, 28-320,
28-320.01, 28-320.02, 28-322.01, 28-322.02, 28-322.03, 28-322.04,
28-322.05, 28-703, or 28-1805, sex trafficking or sex trafficking of a
minor under section 28-831, or subdivision (1)(c) or (g) of section
-15-

LB817 LB817
2026 2026
28-386 or subdivision (1)(d), (e), or (f) of section 28-707; or
(ii) Attempt, conspiracy, solicitation, being an accessory to,
aiding and abetting, aiding the consummation of, or compounding a felony
with any of the offenses listed in subdivision (3)(b)(i) of this section
as the underlying offense.
Sec. 4. Original sections 28-416, 28-1354, and 28-1701, Revised
Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-16-